Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Board of Certified Real Estate Appraisers.

Sec. 08.87.010.
Board created.

There is created in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development the Board of Certified Real Estate Appraisers. The board is composed of five members appointed by the governor. At least one member shall be a person certified under this chapter as a general real estate appraiser, at least one member shall be a person certified under this chapter as a residential real estate appraiser, at least one member shall be an executive in a mortgage banking entity, and at least one member shall represent the public. The board shall elect a chair from among its membership.

History.

(§ 1 ch 177 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 10 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For qualifications of members of initial board, see § 5, ch. 177, SLA 1990 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For board of certified real estate appraisers, see 12 AAC 70.

Sec. 08.87.020.
Powers and duties of board.

In addition to the powers and duties conferred on the board by AS 08.01, the board shall

establish the examination specifications for certification as a general real estate appraiser, as a residential real estate appraiser, and as an institutional real estate appraiser;

adopt rules of professional conduct to establish and maintain a high standard of integrity in the real estate appraisal profession;

adopt regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including regulations

necessary to comply with the requirements of

12 U.S.C. 3331 — 3355 (Title XI, Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989), as amended by 12 U.S.C. 5301 — 5641 (Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act); the regulations adopted by the board under AS

08.87.110

,

08.87.120

,

08.87.135

,

08.87.220

, and

08.87.310

may not be more stringent than the corresponding minimum requirements for receiving approval of the state’s program of certification of real estate appraisers and registration of real estate appraisal management companies under 12 U.S.C. 3331 — 3355 or other federal law ; and

15 U.S.C. 1639e (Truth in Lending Act);

establishing registration procedures and standards for a real estate appraisal management company; and

establishing the standards for the real estate appraisal management company’s appraiser panel, including panel size and member qualifications; and

report relevant information regarding a real estate appraisal management company’s operations, including a disciplinary action under this chapter or a violation of state or federal law, to the Appraisal Subcommittee established under 12 U.S.C. 3310.

The board may

examine the records of a real estate appraisal management company operating in the state;

require a real estate appraisal management company to submit reports, information, and documents to the board;

investigate alleged violations of this chapter;

conduct background investigations as provided in AS

08.87.135(c)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 177 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 88 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 42 SLA 2014; am §§ 3, 4 ch 67 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For applicability of the 2014 changes to this section, see sec. 10(b), ch. 42, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2018 amendment to this section, see sec. 8(a), ch. 67, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For application and examination requirements, see 12 AAC 70, art. 1.

For continuing education requirements, see 12 AAC 70, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective June 19, 2014, in (3), inserted “, as amended by 12 U.S.C. 5301 — 5641 (Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act)” preceding “; the regulations adopted by the board”.

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), in (a)(3)(A)(i), substituted “12 U.S.C. 3331 – 3355” for “12 U.S.C. 3331 – 3352” at the beginning, inserted “08.87.135, 08.87.220,” in the list of Alaska citations, substituted “appraisers and registration of real estate appraisal management companies under 13 U.S.C. 3331 – 3355” for “appraisers under 12 U.S.C. 3331 – 3351”, added (a)(3)(A)(ii), added (a)(3)(B) and (C), added (a)(4), and made related changes; added (b).